Utah statutes.
75-2-1205.   Reformation.

Upon the petition of an interested person, a court shall reform a disposition in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor's manifested plan of distribution and is within the 1,000 years allowed by Section 75-2-1203 if:

(1)  a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment becomes invalid under Section 75-2-1203;

(2)  a class gift is not but might become invalid under Section 75-2-1203 and the time has arrived when the share of any class member is to take effect in possession or enjoyment; or

(3)  a nonvested property interest that is not validated by Section 75-2-1203 can vest but not within 1,000 years after its creation.



Amended by Chapter 301, 2003 General Session

